Utah statutes.
41-12a-403.   Insurance certificate as proof of owner's or operator's
security -- Nonresident.
(1)  The nonresident owner of a motor vehicle not registered in Utah may give
proof of owner's or operator's security by filing with the department the
written certificate of an insurer licensed in the state in which the motor
vehicle described in the certificate is registered, or if the nonresident does
not own a motor vehicle, then in the state in which the insured resides,
provided the certificate otherwise conforms to the provisions of this chapter.
The department shall accept the certificate if the insurer:
(a)  executes a power of attorney authorizing the department to accept service
on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor
vehicle accident in Utah; and
(b)  agrees in writing that the policies certified are considered to conform
with the provisions required under Sections 31A-22-303 and 31A-22-304.
(2)  If an insurer which is not licensed in Utah but which has qualified to
furnish proof of owner's or operator's security under Subsection (1), defaults
in any such undertaking or agreement, the department may not thereafter accept
as proof of security any certificate of the insurer, so long as the default
continues.
